engredup.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [N] [Singular] [Plural] [ContrastRep]

LEXICON Root

Verb ;
Noun ;

LEXICON Noun

cat    NInfl1;
dog    NInfl1;
horse  NInfl1;
mouse  NInfl1;
fish   NInfl1;
bus    NInfl1;
fox    NInfl1;
job    NInfl1;

LEXICON NInfl1

[N]:0                           NInfl2;
[N][ContrastRep]:0[ContrastRep] NInfl2; ! Note alignment

LEXICON NInfl2

[Singular]:0 #;
[Plural]:+s  #;
